North Carolina statutes. Chapter 36A. Trusts and Trustees.
Article 11. Termination of Small Trusts. [Repealed]

§ 36A-125.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1999-266, s. 1, effective January 1, 2000.

Cross References.

As to current provisions on modification and termination of irrevocable trusts, see

G.S. 36C-4-410

et seq.

Editor’s Note.

Prior to its repeal, this section had been amended by Session Laws 1999-337, s. 8, effective July 22, 1999, which had inserted “estate or” in subsection (a).

Session Laws 1999-266, s. 3, made this act effective January 1, 2000 and provides in part that Session Laws 1999-266, s. 1, is applicable to all trusts created before or after that date.